Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-247
School lands; waste or trespass; violations; submission to grand jury.

A judge of the district court shall refer charges made under section 72-245 to the grand jury at each term for investigation, and it shall make presentment of all violations thereof.

Laws 1899, c. 69, § 24, p. 312;

R.S.1913, § 5868;

C.S.1922, § 5204;

C.S.1929, § 72-224;

R.S.1943, § 72-247.